Connecticut, session 2026, HB05336.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 2-138 of the general statutes is amended by adding
subsection (f) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (f) The council shall, within available resources, conduct a
study concerning the demand for skilled labor in the advanced nuclear
energy industry, including the development of nuclear power
technologies such as small modular reactors, microreactors or reactors
that use cooling sources such as molten salt, liquid metal or high
temperature gas. In connection with such study, the council may
recommend legislation or regulations necessary to support the
development, expansion and operations of advanced nuclear energy
technologies in the state, including, but not limited to,
recommendations concerning: (1) Methods to meet the need for skilled
trades workers and other providers of services or labor; (2) the creation
of opportunities for state agencies to collaborate with federal agencies,
institutions of higher education, businesses, nonprofit organizations
and other stakeholders with an interest in the advanced nuclear energy
industry; and (3) any other strategies to promote development of a
skilled labor workforce to meet the needs of such industry. In
conducting such study, the council shall consult with a representative

Substitute House Bill No. 5336
of the Connecticut State Building Trades Council and a representative
of a joint apprenticeship and training committee that facilitates
workforce training in the state. Not later than February 15, 2027, the
council shall submit a progress report, including any recommendations
relevant to such progress report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to commerce and energy. Not
later than February 1, 2028, the council shall submit a full report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, on its findings and
recommendations to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce and
energy.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 20, 2026
Public Act No. 26-46 2 of 2